test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-askihk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - askihkw - ok : # -m animate noun, Canada goose
     askihk+N+AN+Sg: askihk
     askihk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitaskihkom
     askihk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitaskihkom
     askihk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otaskihkoma
     askihk+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otaskihkomiyiwa
     askihk+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitaskihkominân
     askihk+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitaskihkominaw
     askihk+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitaskihkomiwâw
     askihk+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otaskihkomiwâwa
     askihk+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otaskihkomiyiwa

     askihk+N+AN+Pl: askihkwak
     askihk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitaskihkomak
     askihk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitaskihkomak
     askihk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otaskihkoma
     askihk+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otaskihkomiyiwa
     askihk+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitaskihkominânak
     askihk+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitaskihkominawak
     askihk+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitaskihkomiwâwak
     askihk+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otaskihkomiwâwa
     askihk+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otaskihkomiyiwa

     askihk+N+AN+Sg+Obv: askihkwa
     askihk+N+AN+Loc: askihkohk
     askihk+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitaskihkomihk
     askihk+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitaskihkomihk
     askihk+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otaskihkomihk
     askihk+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otaskihkomiyihk
     askihk+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitaskihkominâhk
     askihk+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitaskihkominâhk
     askihk+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitaskihkomiwâhk
     askihk+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otaskihkomiwâhk
     askihk+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otaskihkomiyihk

     askihk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [askihkos, askihkosis]
     askihk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [askihkosak, askihkosisak]
     askihk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: [askihkosihk, askihkosisihk]
     askihk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicaskihkomis
     askihk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicaskihkomis
     askihk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocaskihkomisa
     askihk+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocaskihkomisiyiwa
